Nebraska statutes.
79-1026.01

Repealed. Laws 2011, LB 235, § 26.

This section was amended by Laws 2011, LB18, section 9, and repealed by Laws 2011, LB235, section 26.LB18 became effective February 11, 2011. LB235 became effective April 27, 2011.